Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.692

Authority to regulate massage therapists—Limitations.

(1) A state licensed massage therapist seeking a city or town license to operate a massage business must provide verification of his or her state massage license as provided for in RCW 18.108.030.

(2) The city or town may charge a licensing or operating fee, but the fee charged a state licensed massage therapist shall not exceed the licensing or operating fee imposed on similar health care providers, such as physical therapists or occupational therapists, operating within the same city or town.

(3) A state licensed massage therapist is not subject to additional licensing requirements not currently imposed on similar health care providers, such as physical therapists or occupational therapists.

[ 2016 c 41 s 23; 1991 c 182 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.